Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.281

Student loans—Certain activities may make student ineligible for aid.

Any student who organizes and/or participates in any demonstration, riot or other activity of which the effect is to interfere with or disrupt the normal educational process at such institution shall not be eligible for such aid.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 3. Formerly RCW 28.76.421.]

NOTES:

Legislative declaration—1969 ex.s. c 222: See note following RCW 28B.10.280.